Arkansas, session 2025, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-25-103(d), concerning actions brought in
law or equity for violations of the law related to contractors, is amended to
read as follows:
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, no No
action may be brought either at law or in equity to enforce any provision of
any contract entered into in violation of this chapter. No action may be
brought either at law or in equity for quantum meruit by any contractor in
violation of this chapter.
(2) A contractor in violation of this chapter may bring an
action for unjust enrichment or quantum meruit if the contractor:
(A) Timely pays all fines, if any, assessed against him or
her by the board; and
(B) Properly applies to the board for a contractor's
license issued under this chapter.

/s/Hester

*LGL065*
03-18-2025 14:07:21 LGL065